Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2700.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; I-35 AND CHISAGO CSAH 19.new text end new text begin $30,000,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds account in the trunk highway fund to the commissioner of transportation for environmental analysis, predesign, design, engineering, and construction of corridor improvements on Interstate Highway 35 and Chisago County State-Aid Highway 19 in the city of Stacy. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; I-35 AND CHISAGO CSAH 22.new text end new text begin $17,000,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds account in the trunk highway fund to the commissioner of transportation for environmental analysis, predesign, design, engineering, and construction of corridor improvements on Interstate Highway 35 and Chisago County State-Aid Highway 22 in the city of Wyoming. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin BOND SALE.new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in sections 1 and 2 from the bond proceeds account in the trunk highway fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $47,000,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 167.50 to 167.52, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XIV, section 11, at the times and in the amounts requested by the commissioner of transportation. The proceeds of the bonds, except accrued interest and any premium received from the sale of the bonds, must be deposited in the bond proceeds account in the trunk highway fund. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end